Authors
Jun Yan
Number of Reviews
22

Title
Review for Karakter (1997)
On a dark afternoon, a young man named Katadreuffe is just sworn in as a
lawyer.  The way he chooses to celebrate this achievement is to visit his
enemy, a court bailiff named Dreverhaven and slam a knife on his desk.
Later we see Katadreuffe leaving the building covered with blood.  Soon
we learn that Dreverhaven was stabbed to death with the very same knife,
and the new lawyer is arrested on suspicion of murder.  This provides a
setup for him to unfold his life story through the police interrogation.  
Set in the 1920's Rotterdam, "Character" is a good-looking piece of
melodrama from the first-time director Mike van Diem.  It follows
Katadreuffe's life, out of wedlock from a one-night stand between the
brooding and stony bailiff Dreverhaven and his housekeeper Joba.  She
refuses his marriage proposal and raises her son alone.  He grows up with
strong resentment for his father, and Dreverhaven's action does not help
to improve this relationship either.  He sets numerous obstacles in his
son's road to success, only to watch him jump through the hurdles one
after another by the young man's stubborn and persistant effort.  The
tension between father and son continues to escalate to the point that
it finally ends with a knife.  
The weakness and the appeal of "Character" is its unrestrained passion
displayed among the three members of the family, especially between
Dreverhaven and Katadreuffe.  Hate mixed with love flying and spilling all
over the place, it is easy to be affected, yet hard to completely
understand these characters' motivation and minds.  The most
puzzling and contradictory person is Deverhaven. He appears to
be a ruthless, terrifying man who throws poor people out of their homes
into the streets.  He seems to enjoy making life difficult for his own
son.  On the other hand, he has his reasons -- he believes building
one's character requires hardship and endurance.  Ironically, it all works
very well for his son.  He does not disgard Joba when she is pregnant,
even though he has forced her.  Instead he kept asking her "When is our
wedding?"  He is clearly tired of living, and makes attempts to get
himself killed only to fail.  One can only speculate his degeration to
such a sad existence since the movie refuses to give us any clue about
why.  He is the mysterious father figure that no one understands.  Jan
Decleir has a truly chilling presence on screen as a heavy, intimidating
figure of power, authority and ruthlessness that the mere sight of him in
that black coat and hat can inflict instant fear in the hearts of the poor
and of his own son.  He doesn't have many words, but always casts a shadow
everywhere in the film.  
If the father is intimidating, the mother is no more approachable.  She
seems to enjoy being the only person in the world to drive the mighty
Deverhaven crazy.  She ignores the boy's emotional needs forever.  She
hardly even says a word.  Years later, when her son asks why she did not
marry when his father proposed to her, she is still a stone wall.  She is
so cold and distant that it is almost inhuman.  Again no explanation is
provided and she remains mysterious until she takes all her secrets into
the grave.  
With dysfunctional parents like these, it is no wonder that Katadreufe is
emotionally messed up.  He is a passionate child, with no one to turn to.
He turns out to be unable to release himself from the extreme desire to
piss off his father, or perhaps subconsciously to please him and meet his
expectations.  As stubborn and proud as his parents are, he fights his way
up in a small law firm from the lowest level.  By a faint light, we fancy
the same kind of self-torturing hard struggle in a young Deverhaven years
ago, and the same kind of disillusion when he gets everything he had
wanted, yet realizes that he has lost any chance to find love and a
healthy normal life.  The line between love and hate is blurred.  When his
mother is so indifferent to him, we suspect that even the harsh treatment
from his father is welcome deep down in Katadreuffe's mind -- at least he
gives a damn about him, even if it's mean-spirited.  
Compared to this really dysfunctional family, the movie provides a couple
of rather interesting supporting roles.  Lorna Te George is Katadreuffe's
office coworker who is let down by his failure to express his love for her
(because of whatever demon he has).  De Gankelaar is K.'s boss and mentor
who tries to substitute for a sensible and loving father to him.  He has a
protruding jaw that reminds me of Billy Bob Thornton's Karl Childers in
"Sling Blade", with a warm and understated tenderness.  K.'s only friend
Jan, his mother tenant, is a fun-loving young man and a communist.  These
are K.'s only chance to escape his family and connect to a normal
emotional world, but his blood and destiny pulls him back to his dark
father.  
As a directorial debut, Mike van Diem displays a great deal of confidence
and sophistication in his work.  The tension and passions are pushed to
the highest level, because he never tries to hold it back.  Such approach
often leads to something completely over-the-top, but the nice
performances by the entire cast have prevented it.  Instead, we are
affected by them rather than feeling silly or disbelief. He also shows a
very sure hand in the movement of camera and the transitions between two
scenes.  It's a good thing that van Diem refuses to explain everything to
us including what's on the characters' minds, but some crucial points
become too vague for the audience to identify with or understand.  Another
problem is that the tone throughout the movie is so decidedly and
stubbornly dark and suffocating, that it becomes rather humorless and a
bit too heavy from time to time.  
If the direction is not quite over-the-top, unfortunately the music is.
Always ready to increase the sense of fear, rage, hatred, pain, etc. etc.,
it is just too much.  I feel that the music tries too hard to tell the
story that it loses its effect after a while, as if it was trying to
scream at the audience to tell them how they should feel.  
The things I enjoy the most about this film are the cinematography and
production design.  Filmed in Poland to replicate the scenery of an old
Rotterdam, it is full of symbolic tall and dark buildings that cast
shadows of terror upon one's heart.  The cinematography is truly gorgeous
and breath-taking.  With most scenes shot in the rain, at night, in the
shadows of the houses and under cloudy skies, it effectively creates the
moody world of despair and melancholy.  It is a perfect example of
beautiful camera work becoming a central element of the movie.  It is
simply wonderful to look at.  
Overall, I find it a quite handsomely done piece of work.  I have to
admit that I enjoy watching such bold effort to throw passions at the
audience without holding back.  Grade: B+.  
jun
ps. I was rather disappointed to find out that someone beat me at pointing
out the fact that "Character" and "Star Wars" have strong similarities.

Title
Review for Titanic (1997)
Written and Directed by James Cameron
Music by James Horner
Actors: Kate Winslet, Leonardo DiCaprio, Gloria Stuart, Billy Zane, Bill
Paxton, and about a couple of thousands of extras and stunt people.  
When the budget of this movie went seriously over the expected number, its
creator Jim Cameron offered the studios (Paramount and Fox) to give up his
8 million dollar directing fee and only take the wage for the screenplay
that he wrote, as he claimed, in six weeks.  Well, in my opinion, he made
the wrong offer.  The studio should give him the directing fee, but take
away his writing fee, and even maybe fine him a couple of thousand dollars
for his script.  
Meet Rose, 101 years old (played by Gloria Stuart), brought onto a Russian
submarine by the treasure hunter played by a blond Bill Paxton, to
discuss the whereabouts of a huge diamond neckless, said to be lost in the
famous tragedy of the sinking of Titanic 84 years ago.  Rose, then 17,
went through physical and emotional heaven and hell, and lives to tell her
story on that "unsinkable" ship which sank during its first voyage across
the Atlantic Ocean.  The story unfolds through old Rose's narration.  
Meet the young Rose (played by Kate Winslet), unhappily engaged to Cal
Hockley (Billy Zane), the heir of a billionare.  The first sight of her
tells the audience that she is a free soul underneath the restrictive
dresses. She's your typical bird in a cage, imprisoned by her snobby and
greedy mother and her ignorant, arrogant fiance.  She is surrounded by a
bunch of evil rich people, who don't know the names of Picaso or Freud.
In her desperation, she tries to commit suicide by jumping off the ship,
and, sure enough, is saved by a young man of her destiny.   
Meet Jack, the young guy who saves Rose from suicide.  He's free-spirited,
fun, brave, open, nice, and in case you still don't think it's cliched
enough, he's also a poor, undiscovered but talented artist.  Is there any
question that Rose will be swept off her feet by this adventurous young
man of lower social class, who won the ticket on Titanic from a poker
game?  Is there any question that she will be charmed the daylight out of
her by the fun-loving, care-free, romanticized poor people living
underneath the first class passengers who party all night?  Is there any
question on who's going to be the villains but the evil rich people in her
life, who are determined to keep the lovers apart?  
Like another exceptionally long film, the last year's "Hamlet".  Titanic
is an extremely uneven film with some genuine brilliance and some
unforgivable flaws.  OK, maybe there is only one hole about Titanic, but
it's big enough to sink the entire ship, no matter how big it is -- The
screenplay.  
I had doubts about this film long before I saw it.  It is difficult (no
kidding) to write a teenage, first-love kind of romance, the "boy meets
girl" kind of romance (Cameron's own words) and make it work.  But then
it's doable, as Robert Louis Stevenson had written so neatly, or as
Cameron himself has done so touchingly in his earlier "Terminator" (1984).
So I had hopes that it might just work.  Boy was I disappointed!  For two
days, since I saw this film, I have been thinking just what went wrong.
Could it be the much too cliched plot, borrowed from much too old romances
written by the idealistic rich people of the 19th century who romanticized
the poor?  Could it be the incredibly shallowness of the characters, who
are given as much depth as a piece of typing paper?  Could it be the
laughable villains, who are so cartoonish that they are hardly evil?
Above all, I think it's the dialogue throughout the film, that completely
wipes out its chance to become a good movie.  "To me, it was a slave ship,
I was being dragged to America in chains."  "I'm like a tumbleweed in the
wind."  "It's unfair to put this burden on MY shoulders."  "Promise me, 
you'll never give up."  (like "Promise me you'll come back for me." in
the "English Patient.")  The ghastly lines made me cringe every time the
two leading characters open their mouth.  When Rose says "I was screaming
inside, and nobody cares."  I was also screaming inside "STOP IT!!!  STOP
SPEAKING!!!"  
The dialogues seem to be lifted directly from a paperback romance.  But it
seems to be the writer's intention to be so.  He says, "Jack is a 90's
guy."  Yet, he misses the point that being contemporary is not the same as
being bland and inappropriate.  So many lines, so many jokes are
completely out of place that they bring out embarrassment rather than
laughter.  Most of the romantic words coming out of DiCaprio's mouth to
express his affection are contrived, unrealistic, and even laughable.
Neither in the 90s, nor the teens, would anyone speak like that, except in
Danielle Steel's books.  There is so much cheese in it that I almost
choked on it.  
Cheesy as it is, there are plenty of wonderful moments throughout the
film.  Almost every silent moment ranges from likable to beautiful.  There
is chemistry between the two leads, even though not as strong as it ought
to be.  When the young lovers stare at each other as she standing in the
descending lifeboat, when he draws a sketch of her in nude.  Yet, whenever
one opens his/her mouth, the moment is ruined instantly by the unbearable
dialogues.  Other characters' lines are no better, and none of the
character is memorable; none has enough depth to stand on its own.  Over
and over again, I was let down by the simplistic portrayal of the
villains.  Rose's mother had only one chance to develop a tiny bit of
complexity, in the mean time, Rose's agony and struggle could be much more
profound, yet the chance is gossly missed.  There is more that one time,
that depth could be given to Cal, the fiance from hell, and the writer
could have at least speculate just why he is so obsessed with his
disobedient Rose.  But they are also dismissed.  I could almost visualize
how the story and dialogues could be rewritten to be better.  There is
nothing more frustrating than a potentially good story being told
incompetently.  
On the other hand, the production design of this film is nothing short of
incredible.  There are plenty of filmmakers can turn piles of money into
mediocre visual effects, but Cameron's films are always successful in
make-believes.  Everything is painstakingly done to perfection.  The
second half of the film is filled with extremely realistic visuals.
Throughout the entire film, this huge creation, the ship, and its reckage,
cannot be more convincing.  It looks chillingly real.  So is the scene in
which 1500 frozen bodies floating on the silent black sea.  It is one of
those powerful moments that almost make your heart stop.  There are plenty
of interesting fragments that border on great images, and they all contain
NO dialogue.  
The sinking of Titanic on screen reminds me of "Braveheart".  Both films
are able to explain some very complex processes.  It is to the director's
credit that the audience are able to follow the steps of events that
happened and know how and why.  The usage of computer models helps to
clarify the things happened after Titanic hit an iceberg.  The audience
feel as if they were looking at the real footage of Titanic sinking, and
knowing clearly what is going on.  It is ironic that the ship becomes more
interesting than any of the humans on board.  
The music is very beautiful and haunting.  The cinematography is
absolutely gorgeous and powerful, perhaps the year's best.  Almost every
scene in this 3-hour-plus long movie would be good, if only there was no
words spoken.  It is a paradox for me, always, about both Mr. Cameron and
Hollywood today in general -- how can so much talent, so much money and so
much blood, sweat and effort be spent into a project, without spending a
tiny fraction of that into writing a script with complex characters, deep
(not bloated) emotions, intelligent dialogues and realistic human
situation?  Is it that hard?  Is a good script more expensive than $200
million?  Is the map to the human heart more difficult to draw than a
rebuilding of the biggest ship on earth?  Is human minds so deep that even
those who dive into the sea where Titanic sleeps, cannot reach?  Is it
impossible?  
If it were a silent film, if there were no dialogue at all, "Titanic"
would probably get an A- from me, but as it is, it's B- to C+.  I simply
cannot recommend it to those who do not read paperback romance novels.  

Title
Review for Hollow Reed (1996)
        The small English film "Hollow Reed" is a little like a
made-for-TV production  on Sunday night.  It's inspired by a real
incidence and it centers around a divorced couple and their small son.  It
also contains an inflammatory homosexual relationship.  Howeverr, the
sincerity and seriousness of the filmmakers to the issue of child abuse
seperate this film from others that exploit and sensationalize such
tragedy.  
        Martyn is a middle-class physician who was divorced because he
could not deny any more the fact that he was gay.  Presently, he is living
with a cute (even to a girl) lover and has a stable, happy relationship.
His ex-wife Hannah, who is still bitter about the unfortunate marriage,
has an equally pleasant relationship with an architect Frank.  Martyn and
Hannah's small son Oliver.  Naturally, Hannah has the custody and Martyn
has only a restricted visiting right -- who says it's easy to be a
homosexual and a dad the same time?  
        The film starts with Oliver's frentic escape to his father's
apartment with a terrible cut on his face.  He was frightened, but lied
about the cause and the person responsible for such a brutal crime.  It
was not hard for any viewer to figure out who did it, and it was a little
odd that Martyn the father did not until the second incidence in which
Oliver ended up with hand fractures.  At least the filmmakers made no
secret that Frank, Hannah's boyfriend, is a violent child abuser.  
        Things got sticky when Martyn went to court seeking the custody
and safety for his son.  He was obviously on not-so-firm ground being
homosexual and living with a man.  Tension escalated to a final showdown
between the father and the abuser.  I have to say that it's not a
completely satisfying ending to deserve the heart-wrenching development of
the whole film.  
        Even though childless as I am, I did not hold back a couple of
drops of tears when I watched the unspeakable scenes of child abuse.  It
was, however, more of rage than of sadness, and it made the character
Hannah a not very believable person -- at least to me.  Even after her
seeing the abuse with her own eyes, she continues to allow her boyfriend
living in the house and getting the chance to beat up her young,
defenseless child.  The film goes through great trouble to argue that she
is not a bad person and she loves Oliver very much, yet I just don't buy
that.  Of course, it's true that a parent's pleasure and happiness may not
be consistent with their child's, but I still cannot imagine anyone who
loves their children would let such horrible abuse go on.  The writers
want us to sympathize  with Hannah along  with feeling for Oliver -- well,
they cannot have it both ways, no matter how hard they try to explain her
bitterness and hurt from her failed marriage.  
        Martyn, the father, was more sensibly written and easier for the
audience to identify with.  His anguish and frustration are understandable
and his situation beyond his own control.  The helplessness of not able to
protect his own son is nicely delivered by Martin Donovan.  Still, I
cannot help comparing this film to Sling Blade, which involves a similar
theme of child abuse.  The characters in this screenplay pale due to
their simplicity and lack of depth.  They are farely straight forward,
especially the villain Frank, who is stereotypical and very predictable.
The situation is also fairly see-through for the audience to take sides.
One side is a loving and decent father and his extremely understanding and
caring companion in a warm, stable relationship; the other is a selfish
mother (yes, selfish, a more old-fashioned word than denial) who weighs
her own pleasure over her child's safety and a terrible scumbag
child-beater.  There is no challenge, no dilemma, no ambiguity in the
situation.  The same problem lies in the climax of the film that is too
convenient and too easy.  

Title
Review for Conspiracy Theory (1997)
        A black helicopter flew in the middle of a busy street in New York
and a bunch of armed soldiers dressed in black started landing through
ropes.  Need I explain why there is a rumor about black UN helicopters
invading United States?  Just watch "Conspiracy Theory."  
        The first half hour of this movie is absolutely intriguing and
promising.  Jerry Fletcher (Mel Gibson) is just a small-time New York cab
driver minding his own little harmless business, which is printing a
little harmless newsletter spreading rumors about government conspiracies.
(I won't spoil them for you since they are the best part of the film)  One
day his seemingly wacky fantasy suddenly come true and he is kidnapped and
tortured in a small house by a malicious Dr. Jonas (Patrick Stewart).  Now
I smell the chilling thriller "Vanishing" (the original version).  
        Unfortunately, the writer of the screenplay seems to run out of
ideas from this point on.  All they can ever do is to plagerize some
really lousy B movies of such theme (brain washed assassins blah blah
blah).  As if they realize how idiotic their story is, any explanation is
drowned in Jerry's feverish schizophrenic babbling.  In the end, the whole
story is buried under a stupid romance theme, which in itself was terribly
developed.   
        Let's start with the romance.  A lawyer of the Justice Department
Alice (Julia Roberts) tolerates Jerry's open obsession for her because he
saved her from being mugged once and even visited his heavily-guarded
apartment (I mean *heavily* guarded).  Although at first shrugging off
Jerry's crazy ideas (like any sane person would), she starts getting
suspicious after meeting Dr. Jonas, with the words "BAD GUY" written all
over his face.  The problem is, there is NO chemistry between Roberts and
Gibson.  Roberts often looks slightly embarrassed to be reading the
awkward lines, while Gibson seems nearly breaking into laughter at his own
cheesy, cheap love talk to her.  It's embarrassingly juvenile and
primitive, attempted in half-hearted playfulness that's all pretending and
not an ounce of emotion to it.  
        Then the action sequences.  As a veteran director with "Lethal
Weapon" series in hand, I cannot believe how bland and wimpy the actions
are in this movie.  Some routine explosion and shoot-'em-up's.  The
connecting non-action elements are long and dull, extremely uninteresting,
filled with stupid dialogues that make no sense.  Again, he displays great
pleasure in torturing and shooting up his buddy Mel Gibson, which is the
more intense and dark part of the film.  
        Although appropriately wacky and weird, Gibson's Jerry remains
unsympathetic throughout the film, never really stands up as an
interesting character with real emotions and fears.  I think he always
watched to play a mental patient and here's the chance.   As for why
Roberts would keep taking meaningless and badly-written roles in cheesy
thrillers is beyond me.  She doesn't even seem like having fun!  

Title
Review for Terminator, The (1984)
Writer: James Cameron with Gale Ann Hurd
Director: James Cameron
Producer: Gale Ann Hurd
Actors: Linda Hamilton, Arnold Schwartzennegger, Michael Beihn
        One of the most popular films of all time, "The Terminator" is
does not look too old for being made in 1984 except for Linda Hamilton's
funky haircut.  After watching it for the 6th or 7th time today, I feel it
deserves a review.  
        Sarah Connor is just a waitress living in Los Angeles who cannot
be more ordinary.  She has the same problem everyone else has in this
world.  Then why would a ruthless killing machine from the future -- the
terminator, go through every imaginable trouble just to exectute, or
terminate, her?  And why would another man who claims to be a soldier
from the same place as the terminator, give up his own life just to
protect her?  Soon we learn that the future is doomed and the only hope
for mankind, John Connor, is the unconceived, unborn child of Sarah.  So
the race is on between Kyle Reece, seagent of the underground army led by
John Connor in the war against the evil machines and computers, and T101,
played by Arnold, the never quitting machine that would just not give up
his assignment.  
        Unlike the more technically refined sequal T2, this original
Terminator has the crude look of a smaller and more personal film.  What
still amazes me now is the enormous ability of Jim Cameron to mix strong
emotions and mood with breath-taking action sequences.  Repeatly, scenes
are set to contrast the huge and oppressing image of machines and the
fragile and desperate humans struggling for survival.  He preys on our
fear for the dominance of computers and machines and the feeling of
alienation in a technological world.  The idea is not terribly original,
but he does it in a sincere and unpretentious way that is convincing.  
        What about this movie that pushes all the right buttons in me to
make me jump?  I think it's the sense of the end of the world, the sadness
of the inevitability of the doomed future that one can fight but cannot
change.  As if one is told in absolute certainty the s/he is to die of
this kind of death with no escape.  And no matter how hard we try to avoid
it and seem to succeed, we know deep down it's coming and unstopable.
It's  a primal fear in us for death, symbolically. 
        The writers and director stress the frailty of humans, both in
Kyle Reece and Sarah Conor, in sharp contrast to the indestructable
terminator -- you just can't kill it.  The sight of the burnt down machine
chasing Sarah in the factory is a nightmare that is as effective as any
horror movie.  The vulnerability in our main characters are both physical
and emotional.  That makes the audience identify with them and be repulsed
by the might powerful machine.  I am particularly fascinated by the
writers' constructing of the psychological state of Reece, given an
entirely imaginary world in which he grew up.  It is just so darn rare
for a thriller to even remotely *care* about its characters.
        And the romance developed in the middle of all the intense car
chase and gun blasts is, believe it or not, more heart-throbbing to me
than most movies that try too hard to be romantic.  Because we care about
the couple and we follow them through their life-and-death journy, it's
natural that they generate a tender feeling toward each other since the
world is gonna end anyway.  I hope this explains the big soft feeling
stuck in my throat every time I watch the part where he said, "I came
through time for you, Sarah.  I love you,  I always have."  
        A couple words on casting.  I don't know who thought of casting
Arnold as the terminator.  His physical appearance fits perfectly in the
role of a cold-blooded, undefeatable killing machine and came through as
absolutely chilling and terrifying.  I'm afraid this caused type-casting
for Arnold to prevent him from his future comedies just like Rambo ruined
Stallone's chance of doing Ellery Quinn.  Michael Biehn, as much as I like
him, is truly not very good at acting.  However, he has the look of a
desperate and damaged man, a man in pain and hurt, more emotionally than
physically.  Simply the look is enough.  It's no surprise that Cameron
later casted him as the psychotic villain in "The Abyss."  Linda Hamilton,
with her "lion"-style haircut, successfully leads us down the path of
Sarah Connor's transformation.  In the end, we are convinced that she is
capable of being a "legend" mother.  And all this makes her astonishing
appearance in this sequal natural and less strange.  It is interesting to
see her evolve from screaming and being saved (which is not at all
unnatural after building up her normal life) to fighting to save both
herself and her lover in the final confrontation sequence.  
        I am a true believer in smaller and more personal movies.  It's so
ironic to see Jim Cameron going bigger and bigger while becoming less and
less engaging and personal.  Too much technology, the power of big
corporations and alienation of human emotions and feelings are the things
he condemned in both Terminator, yet I find him sliding down the same
slope. "The Terminator" is probably the smallest, crudest, least perfect
in special effects, yet it still is my very favorite.  

Title
Review for Pulp Fiction (1994)
Written and Directed by Quentin Taratino
        It's a little hard to write a capsule on Pulp Fiction, as it is
composed of several loosely connected stories tied together and cannot be
described with minimal amount of words.  The first story line is about a
couple of professional hitmen (played by John Travolta and Samuel L.
Jackson) retrieving an important suitcase for their boss while killing a
couple of young thugs who stole it.  It goes on to follow the romantic
relationship between the boss' new wife (Uma Therman) and Travolta.  It
contains a very cute dancing sequences and hilarious dialogues as well as
two subtle and fine performances.  
        Another episode involves an on-his-way-to-retirement boxer (Bruce
Willis) pulling a trick on Travolta's hitman's boss for the sake of both
money and pride.  His addventure quickly turns dark and bizzare, but he
finally gets to ride into the sunset -- debt free -- with his little
French girlfriend, thanks to his father's watch.  It is, in my opinion,
the weakest part of the whole film, because it does not feel too original
comparing to the rest of the movie.  The problem is that the plot twists
take more priority over *situations*, which is what Tarantino really
excels in, and the story, however strange it is, feels familiar and
over-the-top.  
        The third chapter is called "The Bonnie Situation," in which the
story goes back to trace the two hitmen after the retrieval of the
suitcase.  Taratino wrote himself a hilarious small role, although he
proves again he cannot act.  Just as funny is Harvey Kietel, playing
a meticulous man that helps to solve the eternal problem of how
to get rid of a bloody dead body.  The ending completes a full circle to
resolve the restaurant robbery that is described in the very beginning of
the film.  
        This is Taratino's more refined and sophisticated work comparing
to his first effort "Reservoir Dogs."  It bares his trademark of slightly
absurd dialogues in the most unlikely situations, such as a lengthy
discussion about foot massage before a killing takes place.  They are so
unreal, funny and witty that, after a while, they kind of grow on me.
It's a treat for the audience's ears. There are numerous "blocks" of
dialogues or monologues that are worth chewing on.   Except for unusual
conversations, Tarantino is best at handle a "situation" of conflicts and
complexity and the characters within the situation.  The non-linear
narrative and slightly off-centered characters are all interesting and
neat.  The cinematography reminds me of some black-and-white films from
the 40s and 50s (although I'm terribly ignorant of old movies) in which
the characters move within a frame while the camera is held steady.  The
shots are multi-layered that interesting things are displayed
simultaneously both in the front and in the background.  Things are all
cool and fun. However, I was not entirely impressed with the film for it
was not too far beyond cleverness, until the finale.  
        The ending of the restaurant robbery is the best part of Pulp
Fiction, which literally transformed the whole film to a higher level.
The true jewel is Samuel L. Jackson's conversation about faith, revelation
and redemption.  His "you approach this shit the wrong way" speech
feels more persuasive and convincing than any self-conscious religious
talk in "Contact".  His "walk the earth" intention even reaches beyond
pure christianity and shares a touch with Zen Buddism and Taoism.
Finally, Jackson's gunman becomes a preacher to talk a couple of small
robbers out of their robbery completely blows me away.  Like the ending of
"The Usual Suspect," it takes the film from ingenuity to profoundness that
is neither pretentious nor shallow.  I was truly surprised.  It was a
priceless scene and Jackson's performance delivers every drop of juice in
the script.  I don't see why he did not get nearly as much attention as
Travolta did,(Maybe he's not a good-looking white male actor who's adored
by everyone in the business?)  but Jackson's presence is truly special.
Just for the last half hour, it is worth the price to see "Pulp Fiction." 

Title
Review for Carne trémula (1997)
Directed by Pedro Almodovar, "Live Flesh" is a complicated melodrama with
multiple angles of relationship, about the issue of love, desire, sex and
all the other passions in life.  
There are five players in this story and each becomes involved with
another one way or the other.  Victor Plaza is a hot-headed young man who
falls in love with the girl with whom he had his first sexual experience
in a public bathroom. This undeniably pretty girl, Elena, however, cannot
even remember his name.  She is the daughter of a rich Italian diplomat
and a drug addict on the verge of a nervous breakdown when Victor comes to
her door.  They got into an argument and Elena's gun is misfired, an event
that draws two policemen to the scene.  The two men have their own
problems though.  The older, obviously drunk cop Sancho just beat up his
wife Clara for her suspected extramarrital affair.  It doesn't take a
genius to realize that this somehow has to do with the younger, more
rational cop David.  
As a terrible misunderstanding and unexpected events go on in Elena's
apartment, Sancho and Victor struggle for the gun when a bullet is fired
to hit David and paralyzes him.  Victor is jailed for 6 years for this
crime that we later learn he does not commit.  When he is released, Elena,
the woman of his dreams, has straighten up and married David, who is now a
wheelchair basketball player.  Bitter for his misfortune, Victor dreams of
taking revenge on both of them, while fate takes him promptly to her door.
In the mean time, Victor meets this older woman who would sleep with him
and fall in love with him with all her desperate tenderness of an abused
wife.  Who could that possibly be in a melodrama like this?  Our Clara,
Sancho's wife, of course.  
All three men are head-strung and stubborn and jealous.  None would easily
back down from their love and desire.  The women are no push-overs either.
So the entangled relationships unfold...  At one point I really wonder how
this terrible mess would resolve itself, but the development and ending
are not easily predictable and relatively sensible.  
This is definitely a melodrama on the brink of soap opera.  The filmmakers
do not hesitate to use coincidence to carry the plot or push the
plausibility of the story.  However, these can be easily forgiven because
the fascinating and colorful characters.  None can be described with one
word nor can be categorized as good or evil.  David appears to be calm and
strong mentally, but also sleeps with his partner's wife and just as
jealous as Sancho.  Elena accepts her responsibility and at least tries to
correct her wrongs only to become the trigger of the tragedy once again 6
years later.  She also has this really brutal honesty that is just a bit
too... blatant.  Clara does sleep with other men behind her husband's
back, but she is also the victim of abuse and her pain and fear are
tangible.  Sancho is perhaps the least sympathetic character, at least to
us female audience, but he clearly loves his wife deeply and almost just
as desperate as she is, though for a different reason.  Is Victor the only
innocent soul?  Far from it.  He has no intention to back down from a plot
to destroy two marriages (although he is somewhat "entitled" to do so to
Sancho) and indirectely causes tragedy in the end.  And he is obviously
using Clara to teach him the techniques to please women while he does not
love her at all.  All characters are deadly passionate and seriously
flawed but still believable and morally ambiguous.  This is the ultimate
strength of this film.  Almodovar's relentless, uncompromising approach to
the characters is the key to make the film refreshing.  Not for once does
he show the laziness to lessen the mixed quality of these characters.  He
does not hestitate to push the emotional conflicts and moral dilemma to
their extremes and is willing to go all the way. 
The film has quite a few bold love-making scenes as well as dialogues.
Are they explicity?  Definitely.  Are they necessary?  Absolutely.
Without them, the audience will never be convinced why Elena should leave
David to be with Victor, even though Elena and David really do love each
other.  These scenes are brutally honest about love, sex and relationship
as much as Elena's confession.  Sex scenes are often boring and mechanical
on the big screen, more misused than not.  This is one of the few
occasions that they work appropriately as an essential factor in the whole
story.  
The style of this film is consistently passionate and intense as the
emotional texture of the story and the characters.  The colors are
dazzling; the images fantastic; the music hot-blooded.  The songs are so
completely Spanish and over-the-top that they make my blood run faster and
hotter.  Surprisingly, the style works with the story, but never replaces
the story and characters.  That is why it is a successful piece of work.  

Title
Review for Budbringeren (1997)
Written by: Johnny Halberg and Pal Sletaurine
Directed by: Pal Sletaurine
Produced by: Petter Boe and Dag Nordahl
Actors: Robert Skaerstad, Andrine Saether, Per Egil Aske
There are two kinds of movies that are easy to do, but very hard to do
well -- romance and comedy.  Movie audience are given weekly doses of
unfunny, contrived and ugly comedies from the movie-making industry.  I do
not remember the last time I laughed so hard *after* I saw a comedy upon
merely the thoughts of some scenes.  This time, the success in this
difficult genre is the small Norwegian film "Junk Mail," made by the
first-time director Pal Sletaurine.  Even now, as I recall some of the
details of this film, I cannot help laughing.  
        One would certainly have a hard time finding a more unlikely hero
than that in "Junk Mail."  His name is Roy Amundsen (played by Robert
Skaerstad), a total and complete loser with little redeming merit.  He is
a bored mailman who would throw away mail and open letters on the job when
he feels like it.  He lives in a shabby and dirty (as dirtiness can be)
little apartment in a part of the city not unlike the worst part of
downtown LA.  He eats out of canned food and does not seem to wash the
pile of dishes left in the sink for weeks.  The last time he washed his
clothes or himself might well be years ago.  "What are you good at?" joke
his coworkers in the cafeteria while he responds with embarrassed silence.
"Walking" was all his female coworker can come up with.  
A coincidence leads him to Line (played by Andrine Saether), a
good-looking deaf girl to whom Roy becomes attracted.  She makes the
mistake of leaving her keys in the mailbox, so he gains access to her
apartment, and accidentally saves her life when she attempts suicide.
Soon enough he becomes involved in her life as well as a mess of crimes
and some stolen money.  As clueless as he is, he somehow manages to defeat
Line's violent and psychopathic boyfriend Georg (Per Egil Aske), who does
not appear to be much more intelligent than Roy.  
As pathetic and unattractive as Roy is, somehow we tolarate him as the
protagonist of the movie, because there is a boyish innocence about him.
His actions may not be heroic, but are by no means mean-spirited or
malicious.  He is only trying to do whatever his feeble judgment can come
up with, like a boy ill-equipped with the wisdom to deal with life
situations.  In the mean time, it's not like he is surrounded by smart
people either.  His coworkers, bosses and everyone around him are no
Einstein to say the least.  It certainly shatters our false impression
that there are no idiots or losers in Norway.  The movie succeeds in
maintaining Roy's personality and capability throughout without letting a
word of remote intelligence pass through his lips.  Robert Skaerstad gave
a very effective performance as a loser stumble through a series of
adventures with limited resources.  And much to our amazement, we do
gradually feel like rooting for him after a while.  The other supporting
actors are quite good too, with numerous hilarious moments.  
The plot twists seem rough and not very well-thought, and the whole crime
business and where the money came from are never really explained.
However, the jokes are so effective and within characters that we laugh
nevertheless.  It is not an ambitious project, nor is it trying to preach
anything.  The characters are original and amusing. I thoroughly enjoy it
for its off-beat and unexpected humor.  Many critics call it dark or
brooding.  I just didn't see it, but find it rather cute and sweet in a
very strange way.  It is difficult to many people laugh and even harder to
make them laugh still hours later after they see it.  This movie does it
effortlessly.  

Title
Review for Snow White (1997)
To tell you the truth, I grew up with fairy tales -- but which girl
didn't?  Unlike the cenored and sugar-coated Disney version, the Grimm
Brothers' collection of folklores and fairy tales are quite bloody and
dark according to today's standard.  What made me interested in watching
this film as an adult is the curiosity to see the ruthless and brutal
nature of the story itself and today's interpretation.  
As we all know, Snow White's mother wished for a baby with skin as white
as the snow and lips as red as the blood.  The film opens as the Bavarian
nobleman Hoffman (Sam Neill) riding home in a carriage with his wife
Lilliana, who is pregnant.  A terrible accident happens, and he has to cut
her open to save the baby -- the first bloody element.  Snow White --
Lilliana Hoffman grows into the beautiful little girl her dead mother had
wished for.  Unfortunately, her father soon remarries and takes home a
beautiful wife that occupies all his affection and attention.  Lady
Claudia (Sigorney Weaver), to the contrary of the usual opinions, does not
start as a witch.  She tries to be friendly and get along with the young
Lillie, without much success.  She does not abuse her stepdaughter.
Although tension remains between the two women as Lillie grows up, things
remain civilized, until nine years later, when Lady Claudia finally
becomes pregnant with a boy, a possible heir.  
Claudia's sanity quickly degenerates as his baby boy dies at birth.  It is
at this time that her Magic Mirror starts talking to her.  This seems to
be a clear cut case of postpartum manic depression with psychosis.  She is
suddenly convinced that Lillie is responsible for her boy's death.  This
deviates from the original story's theme about female rivalry and fear for
loss of youth and good looks.  The interesting thing is the lack of
supernatural elements up till this point, in which the talking mirror may
as well be Claudia's hallucination rather than some evil force.  I was
quite fascinated by the attempts of the filmmakers to explain the fairy
tale in a realistic way.  
Things change when Lady Claudia begins to practice black magic and
witchcraft.  She sends her mute brother Gustav to kill Lillie in the
forest and bring back her heart.  Of course she escapes, and runs into
seven... nope, not dwarfs, but seven miners with shady past, among which
only one is a dwarf.  None of them is cute, sweet, funny or friendly.
Unable to find her way home, she gradually gets along with them while
Claudia continues trying to do some remote killing with little success.
Although young, naive and innocent, Lillie is another example of "die
hard" character.  
At this point, the film becomes strangely dark and bizzare, as Claudia
turns madder and madder.  I was bored by the predictability and weirdness;
I started to doubt about the point of remaking a well know fair tale.
What's interesting, however, is the attraction that develops between
Lillie and one of the miners Will (Gil Bellows).  I could not figure out
what they are going to do with it.  
As we all know, Claudia finaly sets out to poison Snow White with an
apple, and succeeds.  The prince in this film is not a prince, but a
physician and family friend Dr. Peter Guttenberg (David Conrad).  He finds
her, but she is dead.  In the mean time, a few twisted things happened at
home in the Hofffman household.  I was really growing impatient by then as
the whole thing seems to be a disappointment afterall.  However, the plot
makes a few neat turns and delivers some interesting twist.  The last
20 minutes or so has shadows from "The Terminator", "The Abyss"
("Breeeeeath!"), "Portrait of Dorin Gray", "Buffy the Vampire Slayer" and
some generic horror flicks.  Although definitely not original, it
nevertheless surprised me mildly given the situation.Plus, as a 90's fairy
tale, the heroine is bound to kick some butts rather than waits to be
rescued.  With some graphic moments, this is definitely not for kids. 
What's good about the film is the occasional unpredictability mixed with
cliched elements from the original story, and its attempt to instill
reality into the interpretation.  The production design and costumes are
quite lousy and ... eh... inexpensive -- but I guess it's a made-for-tv
movie afterall.  Nothing impressive.  
The actings are at best mediocre, except for Weaver, who carries subtlety
and complexity in the first half and throughout her transformation, but
unfortunately goes over the top as her character turns hopelessly evil and
insane.  
For the standard of tv movies, it deserves a B+, but as a movie, I give it
a generous C, because I'm a sucker for new interpretation  of old tales,
any time.  I did enjoy it.  

Title
Review for Ko dou gai bei (1997)
I was hesitant to rent this movie, because I know Ringo Lam has the
capability of depressing me and affecting me.  And this time he did not
let me down, either.  
Lau Ching-Wan plays inspector Pao, the leading officer of the Serious
Crime Squad of Hong Kong police, investigating a crime involved with a
body of an architect found in the water tank of a resident building.  Soon
the murderer is captured, and we learn that a big robbery is going to
happen.  A police officer dies on duty while pursuing the gang of robbers.
The suspect Mak Kwan, who is an essential member of this robbery, escapes
from the prison with the help of his devoted girlfriend.  Pao is on the
trail of the criminals, while both he and the escaped villain are haunted
by their experience of killing.  Hence, the cat-and-mouse game goes on
around a safe room full of cash.  
Some of Ringo Lam's style of his crime dramas remind me of "French
Connection" and the good parts of "Heat".  It's a cold, gruesome and
almost documentary-like fashion to display violence and danger.  There is
a genuine intensity and suspense hanging over the entire film.  There are
very very few scenes in which the action sequences do not feel real.  The
cinematography remains dark throughout the film, never losing the mood and
atmosphere of tension.  There is a great sequence of Lau pursuing the
suspect on foot and almost shot a motorcyclist passing by.  It's long and
realistic, unlike any similar sequence done in the usual way.  There is
very little music, and many of the intense scenes are carried out in
complete silence.  It works wonderfully in Ringo Lam's gritty, almost
brutal style of filming the actions.  
The screenplay is very well-written, too.  Although the setup sounds
routine with cop-and-robber stuff, it makes the process fascinating
because neither side is particularly smarter than the other, and the
police remains only half a step behind the robbers.  Almost perfect pace
of unfolding the plot of the crime, the script never loses its realistic
touch.  Some very intriguing action sequences, but they never feel staged
or crafted.  The screenplay does not glamourize either side of the law.
Both the cops and the criminals are immersed in a sense of desperation and
weariness.  The mood is shown with minimalistic fashion most effectively.  
However, the very best thing about this movie is not the style, nor the
story, but the characters, especially Inspector Pao, who is a
soft-hearted, vulnerable man with very few words.  He is tired of the
ugliness of his job and of the world.  He loves his wife and baby son and
feels guilty for the danger caused by his job.  He is every bit believable
and intimate as a character can be.  Lau Ching-wan is at his very best as
I have seen playing such a real and complicated family man.  There is a
thin line between being stoic and being subtle.  Although he had been
accused of being wooden before, Lau is most competent and subtle in this
role.  He successfuly mixes all the toughness and gentleness, sadness and
pride, and all the inner conflicts, then presents it in a subtle but
convincing way, but not so subtle that you'd miss it.  The numerous
memonts where he let his vulnerability out are the most moving and
refreshing, yet never ever one bit overdone.  The amazing strength of this
film is its pricision in handling both the violent scenes and the tender
scenes, never feeling a bit over-the-top or manipulative.  It's done just
right.  
Compared to Lau Ching-Wan, Francis Ng's Mak Kwan is far less impressive,
thus one of the few flaws of this film.  The main villain does not carry
the same weight as the main hero, as was better done in Lam's other
classic "City on Fire".  His relationship with the girlfriend, which is
obviously intended to mirror Pao's family ties, do not work nearly as
convincing and effective.  Although written in a relatively ambiguous and
sympathetic way, this character pales in comparison of Danny Lee's in
"City on Fire" and Ng's performance did not hold his own opposite Lau.
This flaw may not be severe, but it does hurt the power of the finale of
the face-off between the two.  
Subtlety and realism are Ringo Lam's strength, and Lau Ching-wan is the
perfect cast to fit in this style.  I even consider his performance here
rivals that of Chow Yun-Fat's in "City on Fire" as well as the writing.
At the last shot with Lau breaking down in tears, I almost had tears in my
eyes too.  

Title
Review for Face/Off (1997)
Written by Mike Werb & Michael Colleary;
Produced by David Permut, Barrie Osborne, Terence Chang
Actors: John Travolta, Nicolas Cage, Joan Allen, Gina Gershon
Directed by John Woo
        I had been worried about this film ever since I heard the plot.
It's PREPOSTEROUS!  Who would buy into such a crazy idea without either
being confused or turned off by its ridiculous nature?  Given the terribly
disappointing career in Hollywood so far for John Woo, I had enough reason
to keep a low expectation for "Face/Off."  Well, I have to say I was
pleasantly surprised by the final product.  The concept is still
preposterous, but everything else is quite well done. 
        The movie opens with an assassination attempt 6 years ago that
results in FBI agent Sean Archer's(John Travolta) little son Michael.  It
becomes the driving force for Archer to pursue the worst of the worst
terrorist Castor Troy(Nicolas Cage).  In a breath-taking confrontation
within the first half hour of the film, Troy is captured, but remains in a
coma.  In order to dig out the secret hiding place of a time bomb set by
Troy earlier, Archer agrees, with hesitation, to switch faces with Troy to
get the information out of Troy's kid brother Poullex in jail.  Well, we
know Troy would wake up and turn the table on Archer and before you know
it, the trap-setter becomes the trapped.  
        Naturally, Archer is in complete hell wearing his worst enemy's
face, becoming the jailed criminal, knowing Troy is now FBI official and
his wife's husband.  He does manage to escape the maximum security
facility and we anticipate an explosive showdown between these two men.  I
was not disappointed.  
        Many details in the plot is very far-fetched and illogical.  The
concept of face-switching is medically IMPOSSIBLE.  Travolta and Cage have
very different body characteristics which should be easily spotted by
Archer's wife (Joan Allen).  There is no way for Troy to know the daily
routine work of FBI and fool all his associates.  Thankfully, the surgical
procedure of ripping off one face and putting it onto another person is
done as vaguely as possible to avoid being too silly.  Surprisingly, the
flow of the movie does not stumble over the vast implausibility due to the
gripping performances from Travolta and Cage, who sucessfully imitate each
other's characteristics in acting within the context of the story.  The
audience are caught in concerns for the characters and thus are willing to
forgive the holes in the plot.  
        Contrast to almost every big-budget action movie in recent years,
"Face/Off" spends numerous quiet moments to develop the story and dig the
characters minds, especially the frustration and fear in Archer that not
only he's wearing Troy's face, but he's slowly becoming Troy inside too.
The characters are interesting because they are not rushed from one fight
scenes from another.  Many small aspects of the film are not treated with
the simplistic formulas.  Archer's family problems, Troy's family
problems, honorable thieves and crooked law enforcement, evil thieves
and good law enforcement, Archer's love for his wife, Troy's affection for
his kid brother, and the tangled relationship among Troy's ex-girlfriend
(played by Gina Gershon), her brother and her small son.  The emotional
drama feels realistic without the cheesiness and stupidity of "Con Air".
The movie is full of small details that reveal the inner conflicts and
motivations of the characters.  Cool and neat. 
        Credit to the writers Werb and Colleary, the romance of two weary
adults, Archer and his wife Eve, is presented with maturity and delicate
balance.  Joan Allen has provided the anchor of sanity to save the film
from going 'way over the top and successfully reduced the sense of
disbelief and ridiculousness in the audience.  Travolta tends to overact a
little in Troy's role and makes his character more cartoonish than scary,
but the occasional flicks of goodness in him rings true and believable.
Cage is refreshing and thoroughly enjoyable as the bad guy in the first
half hour of the movie and is reasonably vulnerable and strong as the
trapped Archer.  
        While the drama of "Face/Off" is intriguing, the action sequences
are absolutely first-rate (except for the fist fight at the very end) and
stomach turning.  The first airplance chasing scene and the last boat
chasing scene are textbook perfection in action filmmaking, while the
church confrontation is most poetic and reminds me the most of the
passionate, sentimental and heart-wrecking films John Woo had done in Hong
Kong.  Although gunfight scenes are abundant in this movie, I don't feel
excessiveness as I did watching "Hard-Boiled" because they are nicely
paced with quiet moments and human interactions.  The characters and
emotional intensity in the action scenes make them engaging and
meaningful.  The master demonstrates *how* a real action movie should be
done with passions and fury and pain.  It's not all about how balletic the
actors move with 2 guns in hand, but more about the rage and hurt and
passion and motives of the players involved.  
        On a last note, I realized recently that the multiple Mexican
standoff can be dated back to the days of 20's and 30's pulp detective
stories, for it is repeatedly used in every other short story by Raymond
Chandler.  I'll be damned if Werb and Colleary never read Chandler and
borrowed more than a little spirit from his passionate, sentimental and
violent tales.  
        "Face/Off" runs 2 hours and 10 minutes, which does not feel long
at all, at least to me.  In fact I didn't want the film to end.  Again, it
proves that realistic characters and human emotions can override
implausibility in plot devices.  Maybe I can finally say John Woo has made
the transition to Hollywood.  Although American audience may not be ready
to accept his ideals and moral obsession with male bonding, friendship and
love, loyalty and betray themes derived from Chinese chivalry stories, he
still can successfully incorporate his uniquely imaginative and innovative
style with Hollywood good screenplays.  Welcome back. 

Title
Review for Die xue jie tou (1990)
        "Bullet in the Head" is an uneven and flawed film.  It's John
Woo's pet project, the one that he put most heart and soul into.
Comparing to his classic "A Better Tomorrow" and "The Killer", it is more
like a long and excruciating personal nightmare that haunts its creator 
and unexpectedly, has haunted the audience too.  
        The movie opens in the orange glow of a warm and cheerful Hong
Kong in 1967.  Three friends grow up together in the slum: Ben, Frank and
Paul.  On Ben's wedding night, Frank borrows from local gangs to pay for
the wedding's expenses and gets beat up by a rival gang.  In a heated
revenge attempt for his friend, Ben kills the gangster.  To escape jail
and disillusioned by the lack of prospects in Hong Kong, 3 friends decide
to run to Vietnam, at the time on the brink of war, in search of
opportunity to make it big.  
        The trio immediately encounter the brutal reality of Vietnam in a
student protest and bombing.  They nearly get killed.  This may be the
only politically relavent part of the film.  After the 1989 Beijing
massecre, any Chinese could recognize the image of a student protester
standing in front of an army tank.  However, it was never the focus of the
film.  
        They are soon involved in local gangsters' activity and meet Luke,
a hired gunman of Chinese-French origin played by Simon Yam.  It is never
clearly explained why Luke becomes an ally with Ben and co., except that
Ben joins his attempt to rescue his lover, a singer fallen to 
prostitution, from the powerful local gangsters.  A long and exhausting
gun battle follows.  This part of the film feels very much awkward and
detached from the rest of it.  It may be part of the original idea Woo
developed with ex-colleague and ex-pal Tsui Hark, since Tsui's own version
"A Better Tomorrow 3" has similar elements.  Woo might have been hestitant
to give up this idea, but it does not work within the context of the film,
which later grows far beyond this type of genre films.  The brief romantic
interaction also displays Woo's inability to present interesting and
convincing female roles.  
        On the way of escape, the singer dies and more horrible things
happen.  From here the film turns completely upside down to something
extremely disturbing and bleak.  Ben, Frank and Paul are captured by
North Viet army and tortured when mistaken as CIA spies.  In one of the
most horrid scenes, they are forced to execute American POW's.  When Luke
and American troops raid the POW camp and rescue them, Paul shoots the 
injured Frank in the head so that he can escape with a case of gold
alone.  
        Ben lives, and finally finds Luke in Saigon as well as Frank
with a bullet in his head, thanks to his childhood friend Paul.  He has
not died, but simply gone mad ...  Ben puts him out of his misery in a
heart-breaking scene.  And there isn't much left for him to do but go back
to Hong Kong and face up to the now big and powerful Paul.  
        In a rare case since "A Better Tomorrow" in 1986, Chow Yun-Fat is
not involved in Woo's film here.  Although this might be originated from
Woo's dispute with Tsui Hark, it feels an appropriate artistic
decision not to have Chow in this movie, because there is no
larger-than-life hero in this film, only a few small-time young men from
the bottom struggling hard.  Only Simon Yam is the "victim" of Woo's 
ultra-cool make-over. Tony Leung Chiu Wai, a critically acclaimed dramatic  
actor, plays the lead character Ben with vulnerability and credibility,
gives a convincing realism to the grim and brutal picture.  He has
a tender side more low-keyed than Chow's heroes.  Waise Lee again takes up  
the evil role for Woo, but his character Paul is weakly written and lacks 
complexity and smooth transition, more like a neurotic mad dog from early
on.  I never gave enough credit to Jacky Cheung, who started out as a
singer in Hong Kong.  He first surprised me in Tsui Hark's "Wong
Fei-Hung." (Once upon a Time in China)  Here he gives a very convincing
and adequate performance as the childish, good-natured Frank. He may have
overacted a bit here and there, but the POW camp part and madness scenes
are memorable, to say the least.   
        The portrait of Hong Kong in the late 60s to early 70s clearly
carries a sentiment on the director's part, as an era that is long gone
and his youth that is long lost, a past he spent in the slum like the
characters in this film, struggling upward in a seemingly hopeless
situation.  The frustration for a grim fate is so real, the tenderness
in shots of the poor neighborhood is so genuine, that no doubt there
has to be some autobiographical elements.  Such a semtiment has also
prevented Woo from neater and tighter editing, I suspect.  (He also did
the editing.)  The film could have been done better, but it requires
certain emotional detachment unavailable to himself. 
        The theme is the eternal topics of friendship, loyalty, betrayal
and revenge.  It may seem cheesy and corny sometimes, yet particularly
effective and convincing in Ben and Frank's bonding.  On the other hand,
Luke's motivation to help the three is not so persuasive (unless you're a
believer of the "homoerotic undertone" theory that's popular in western
critics).  Neither is the transformation of Paul.  
        The dialogues in Bullet in the Head is cut to minimal, barely
enough to string the story together.  Everything is told by images and
actions. Although Woo is never known for writing smooth dialogues, the
silence here is extraordinary even comparing to his other works. As if the
extreme anguish has muted him, Woo loads the depressing tension upon the
audience as the emotionally exhausting sequences go on and on to the
unbearable limits.
        It is obvious that the film has taken much inspiration from "The
Deer Hunters."  But it's ultimately not about wars, but about friendships
and brotherhood, loyalty and betrayal, memory and pain, and the
degradation of humanity.  It is Woo's usual tendency to push emotions to
the extremes, drag his characters through hell, and test his beliefs and
ideals under the most testing conditions, but it is far darker and more
devastating than any of his other films.  It does not have the energy and
uplifting idealism in his other films, but it focuses more on the
vulnerability of powerless small people.  His films are ruled by heart not
brain. I have a really hard time giving "Bullet in the Head" a grade.
Objectively, it's a B+, with much genuine conflict and high concept in the
second half of the film and an uneven 1st half.  But Woo's films are not
to be judged objectively, especially this one in which he put too much of
himself.  

Title
Review for Saint, The (1997)
        I have not seen such an idiotic screenplay for quite a while and
therefore had a hard time adjusting to it in the first half of this movie.
What puzzles me most is that so much money was put in this totally
brainless thing, why couldn't they have written a remotely tolerable
story?!  
        The film starts with an unconvincing and over-the-top of the
origin of Simon the magician as an unhappy and oppressed boy in a Catholic
school.  Years later, this kid becomes not only the best "independent"
international thief around, but the most charming womanizer.  Somehow, he
gets intangled into a sticky Russian business to steal a cold fusion
formula from the beautiful physicist at Oxford.  The bad guys want the
formula and the girl, so does the Saint.  You can guess the rest.  
        Both Val Kilmer and Elizabeth Shue are good-looking people and
dedicated actors, which made their presence on the screen all the more
comical and ridiculous.  I'm not saying scientists cannot be cute blond
young women, but Shue's Emma Russell was so silly and neurotic that could
not pass for a high school freshman girl who desperately tries to fit in.
Her insecurity was so severe that I suspect she realized very clearly how
far her performance was from a real scientist.  The script did not help at
all.  All her speeches about her scientific breakthrough were so
completely stupid that it was just laughable.  Surrounded by all the high
tech toys carried by Val Kilmer (which were not that impressive anyway),
guess where she hid her secret formulas that might solve the energy
problems of the whole world?  They were written on 6 small pieces of paper
and she hid them in her bra!!!  Wow.  She's truly an "old fashioned" girl,
isn't she?                         
        It must have been great fun for Kilmer to switch from one disguise
to another and from terrible British accent to stumbling Russian English.
But the problem is the same as that facing the hero Simon -- sometimes he
was lost as to who he was playing and what disguise to use.  In quite a
few occasions, he appeared to be just as confused as the audience.  
        The portrait of Russia and villains in this movie were totally
ridiculous and implausible as well as the plot.  It's even hard to enjoy
it as a totally bogus fantasy because it seemed to take itself quite
seriously.  The special effects and stunts were just as crude and childish
as the story.  The characters were worse than cartoonish -- they were
dumber than the Jim Carey/Jeff Daniels duo!  There was no chemistry
between them and the relationship was in the least bit touching or
convincing.  I can hardly believe how poor the quality is in every
aspect of this movie.  It's degrading and insulting to Russian people,
scientists, and any viewer who has half a brain.  
        The only two good things about this film were the beautiful views
of Europe and the physical appeal of Kilmer, who was terribly good-looking
here (which you can hardly miss with such a self-indulging performance).
I read somewhere that Kilmer's an extrememly intelligent guy.  Well, I
guess one can't believe everything s/he reads.  
        "The Saint" is like a big, stupid joke that pretends to be
intelligent and stylish.  What can be worse than that?  I'm glad I didn't
pay $7 for this crap.  No choice but to give it an F. 

Title
Review for Hamlet (1996)
I think just about everyone knows what the story is, so I won't bother to
reiterate it. Here is only my comments on Kenneth Branagh's production. 
I saw it in 70mm version. It didn't struck me as particularly large, but
the color and the texture of the picture is incredibly beautiful, with
equally stunning art design, costume and sound effect. The castle was most
magnificent both exterior and interior. I cannot give higher praise to the
richness of the color.  
Comparing to the famous version of Lawrence Olivier, this Hamlet is
brighter, bolder, and more contemporary, and of course, more violent. I
have mixed feelings about including all the sometimes unimportant details
of the play into the film, characters who show up for 5 minutes and never
seen again, and casting familiar movie stars (mostly American) in minor
roles.  All the important roles are performed, with good to great effect,
by British actors, which makes it serious enough, but the cameos give me a
feeling of watching a parody -- not that I dislike it. I think enough
people have pointed out the flatness of Jack Lemmon as Marcellus, but
Robin Williams gave me the most distraction. He's the material of a lead
actor, and his mere presence can make American audience chuckle. He looks
very self-conscious at the moment meant to be tragic (when we know that
Hamlet doesn't know that he's about to be killed by a poisoned sword). And
when he was stabbed to death, it has a rather strange effect. I would
rather see this role played by a nameless actor.  Other American actors
are fairly good in their 10-min to half-hour play. Billy Crystal gave the
appropriate touch to the gravedigger, but again I felt like watching a
parody of Hamlet. When Billy pullled out a whole row of sculls and bones,
I told me friend next to me: "This is not the royal clown's grave, it's
John Wayne Gacy's backyard!"  Then we both missed the famous speech by
Hamlet holding the scull. I mean one scull is enough! 
The whole film struck me as very uneven and kind of strange as to what KB
had been doing. Most parts are made excellently and acted beautifully. KB
himself is adequate as the prince. Kate Winslet, IMHO, is better than any
other Ophelia I've seen and has a slight edge over other actors in the
whole movie. Claudius and Gertude are played well. All the major
supporting actors are better than average and are given sufficient time on
the screen so that we get to know not only the big players. I especially
like the sympathy and explanation given to Ophelia's brother. 
But there are always sloppy details that bother me. The most laughable is
the ghost of old Hamlet. I can't believe how cheesy the special effects
are when the ground shakes and steam comes out and thunders roar. We
laughed so hard at this point that we missed another speech about how
great the old king was and how much he misses him. :) Now I see why
Frankenstein was such a flop. KB's special effects  are almost as good as
Ed Wood's! And the flashback of the fat little boy with a horrible wig as
young Hamlet. There are waaaaayyyy too many flashbacks made in a waaaayyy
too simplistic fashion as if their sole purpose is to spoonfeed the stupid
audience with pictures accompanying the difficult Shakespearian language.
I felt a little insulted. The nude scenes of Ophelia and Hamlet having sex
have offended many experts, but I thought it was credible in this
particular time period in this film.  Yet when Gertude describes Ophelia's
death, I sat and waited for them to show the touching image of O's
drowning and was disappointed with only one shot.  I do NOT understand
what was going on. It's such an unbalanced production that greatness and
silliness co-exist.  Did KB hire some really really incompetent filmmaker
or was he having short attention span? 
This Hamlet looks, IMHO, more ruthless and cynical. The film looks quite
violent and bloody. My fragile friend had to cover her eye when the camera
repeatedly goes back to the pool of blood in the Queen's bedroom. The
ending was very bloody too. When the sword flies and nails Claudius, I had
a strange feeling that KB would be interested in making something like
"Reservoir Dogs." But I liked that scene very much. The death scene of
Hamlet was OK, but it does not surpass Mel Gibson's death scene. 
This film is, as I said, a very unbalanced production. Because of
Winslet's great performance (which has not been adequately recognized :P),
I give it an A-. 

Title
Review for Sling Blade (1996)
        I still can't help the chuckles when I see the TV commercials for
this movie.  It portraits the main character Karl Childers as a "hero" and
makes the movie appear like Forrest Gump, while it is exactly the opposite
of Forrest Gump and a less expensive, but far more complex creation.  
        The film opens as a high school newspapers reporter interviews
Karl Childers (played by Billy Bob Thornton), a mentally retarded man who
has been kept in State mental institute for 25 years for killing his
mother and her lover when they were having an affair.  He was then 12 and
slaughtered them in a rage with a sling blade.  Here Thornton gives an
expressionless yet intense performance with the strange speech patthern
and facial composure that reveals nothing inside him except a few twitches
of the eyebrow.  The lighting was especially dim, which, I imagine,
implies the dark nature of the whole film.  
        Soon after the interview Karl is released from the hospital and
returns to the small town where he was born and raised.  The film goes to
great detail to describe his status unfit for the world outside of him.
For some unexplained reason, Karl refuses to go back to his father, who
has been living in the same town all these years.  The point is raised and
dismissed quickly.  The good-hearted hospital administrator goes through
the trouble to arrange a job at local mechanics for Karl.  Karl also makes
friend with a boy Frank (played by Lucas Black), who likes him so much
that he persuades his mother to let Karl stay in their garage.  
        The fatherless Frank and Karl develop an unusual affection for
each other.  The similar intelligence make them friends and the difference
in age kind of turns Karl into a father figure for Frank.  The two have
several scenes talking to each other about their past and present that are
terribly touching and well-performed.  The repetition is a little obvious
here, but the mood created by the director and the dialogue make up for
it.  
        Frank's trouble lies in his mother Linda (played by Natalie
Canerday)'s boyfriend Doyle (played by country singer Dwight Yoakam), a
"white trash" who is abusive and unstable.  Doyle and Frank's conflict
is obvious from the very beginning.  The tension grows and leads to a
"predictable" ending.  
        As the writer, director and actor of this film, Billy Bob Thornton
has done a quite amazingly good job, but I have to say it's his writing
that's the BEST.  Everything seems quite obvious and predictable at first,
but there is always an uneasiness underneath it, and the more I think of
it, the more I realize it's not the case at all.  First, the town looks
like such a typical southern small town, in which everyone's nice and
kind.  Despite of Karl's homocidal past, the mechanical shop owner hires
him immediately and even buys him lunch.  Linda quickly allows Karl moving
in even though she's a widow living with a child.  The unalarming southern
accent carefully plays on our bias trained by the stereotypes that
the rural people are simple-minded and good-hearted.  Quietly, the movie
slips in messages that are not that pleasant.  First it's Linda's boss
(played wonderfully by John Ritter) who is a good man, but under a great
deal of hostility because he's gay.  Then, there is Doyle, who is
obviously a very unlikable red-neck, who drinks, talks dirty, verbally
abusive and treats children badly (that's a big sign for "villain").  For
some strange reasons, Linda still stick with him even though she doesn't
fit the pattern of "low self-esteem" at all.  
        The film reveals more and more disturbing facts as the story
unfolds:  Frank tells Karl that his father committed suicide because he
lost his job and was ashamed of not able to provide for his family; the
John Ritter character says to Karl that his family are "very mean and
unkind people" and the way he says it makes me wonder; Doyle behaves
violently after getting drunk on a party and a big fight breaks out among
Linda, Doyle and Frank;  the anger and violent tendency displayed by Frank
is alarming and disturbing.  But the most unusual scene is when Karl goes
back to his old house and visits his father (played by Robert Duvall).  We
see a terribly deserted house in which the old man sits in the couch
almost motionless amongst the garbage (I could almost smell the disgusting
house) not much better than a corpes.  Karl says, "I'm your boy."  Yet,
the father insists monotonously, "I ain't got no boy."  Karl delivers
perhaps the most revealing lines in the whole film: "I have studies the
Bible a lot.  The things Mama and you taught me ain't in there." (not
exact words)  On screen for only several minutes, Robert Duvall's
character is probably the most pathetic creature on screen I've seen.
Given extremely limited information, we can only glimpse into Karl's
childhood with twisted parental guidance and great psychological damage.
When he was about 6 years old, his mother had a premature baby boy.
Because they didn't want it, Karl was told to throw it in the dumpster
even though it was alive.  
        It was the horror reflected in the present state of Karl that
takes me aback and makes me question just how normal is
such a small town's life.  Suddenly I'm reminded of something said by
Shelock Holmes that even the filthiest gutter in big cities cannot hide
evil as effectively as romote countryside.  And no one in the film seems
that normal anymore.  
        This movie has some characteristics of Billy Bob Thornton's style
displayed previously in "One False Move" which he cowrote.  One is the
subtle emphasis on the characters' dark, secret past that affect their
present life and the deep, complex nature of human psychology and
motivation.  Why does one choose to do what he does?  The ultimate
question here is: why does Karl kill Doyle? To prevent Doyle hurting
Frank and 
Linda? To prevent Frank's rage turns the boy into another Karl?  Does he
think because he has killed before and is doomed to go to hell, he can
kill again for the boy's benefit?   There are also other questions just as
puzzling and the writer gives no obvious answer: Why does Linda continue
an obviously unhappy relationship with a guy like Doyle and even decides
to marry him?  Just how retarded is Karl?  He carefully calculates the
murder of Doyle and prepares it with the precision of a mad man, but
certainly not a retarded man.  What's the significance of religion to
these people?  Karl gets himself baptised, indicating his willingness to
"be good," then why did he choose killing that he KNOWS will bring him to
hell?  
        Another strength of this film is the characters.  Like "One False
Move" but even more ambiguously, he establishes complicated peripheral
characters as well as the central one Karl.  They seem to fit into certain
formulas but then they really don't.  Is Doyle the bad guy?  He's not
unaware of his offensive talk and behavior.  He appears quite smart and
manipulative with words.  He establishes dominance skillfully with
threats.  He's also a coward easily bent under power.  You can see clearly
that he's constantly testing other people's limit to tolerate him and
accept his control.  Is he violent?  He certainly appears to be with
unstable mood and acts, but if you look carefully, he didn't really beat
up anyone except pushing Linda once.  However, the viewers always get the
impression that he's dangerous, partly due to his unpredictability.  Is
Karl the good guy?  He kills Doyle is such a cold-bloodly fashion that one
has to question his sanity and morality.  Maybe there is no answer to good
and evil, only the unsolved mystery of human behavior. 
        Nothing is what you see and what it appears to be.  This film is
full of twists and turns and irony.  Many cliches are presented in a
familiar but slightly different way that produce a completely troubling
response.  The feelings are strange, yet strangly natural and genuine.
It's a very dark and disturbing study of psychological issue while
providing numerous comical scenes and dialogues.  I'm totally at awe with
Thornton's writing, which the more you dig, the more unexpected meanings
you find.  The casting is also rather weird, but very effective.  The
directing is successful in creating mood and style that affect the
audience, while some parts can be improved.  I have a feeling that
Thornton did not intend to create a masterpiece and make it grand and
perfect.  The dialogue is unsurpassed by any film I saw last year.

Title
Review for Promesse, La (1996)
        In some way this very little publicized (at least here in the
States) Belgian film reminded me of an American film a couple of years ago
named "Fresh."  They both follow a boy's journey through a world that's
falling apart and in which they grow up too fast.  
        As the film opens, it makes no secret that our central character
Igor, about 14 years old, is a ruthless little thief.  It also explains to
us why -- he lives with his father Roger, a scumbag in the business of
smuggling illegal immigrants into Europe.  In Igor's world, all the adults
are thugs, low-lives who lie, steal, rob, cheat, betray and bribe whenever
necessary.  Morality is merely inexistent.  One cannot help blending in
with his world.         
        Assita and her baby are newly arrival from Bugina Faso, Africa to
unite with her husband, who work illegally in Belgium for minimal income,
live in the dumpester apartment provided by the blood-sucking Roger.  Soon
there is a hardly detectable affection developing between Igor and Assita.
One day in a frentic rush to escape the inspection from the Labor
Department, Assita's husband fell from the building while working for
Roger and bled to death because Roger refuses to take him to a hospital.
Before he dies, Assita's husband asks Igor to take care of his wife and
baby.  Igor makes the promise, thus the title.  
        The promise, it turns out, is not so easy to carry out.  Assita
grows more suspicious everyday about disappeared husband.  Roger tries
every way possible to cover up his track and forbid Igor's attempt to help
her.  As conscience begins to awaken within Igor, conflicts with his
father becomes inevitable.  The film makes it clear that it's hard to do
the right thing and it doesn't get any easier as you try to carry it on.  
        When Roger finally decides to get rid of Assita by selling her
into prostitution, Igor faces the ultimate choice: to do the right thing
and split with his only family in the world, or to stand aside and salvage
his relationship with his father.  Keep in mind that he is still merely a
child with a heavy moral burden on his heart.  Meanwhile, the deceived
Assita is still pressing the burning question "Where is my husband?"  
        The film is about how morality and conscience emerges in a young
mind that has never been exposed to such concept.  The uncompromising
script makes the situation every bit difficult as it could be for our
young man Igor.  Roger, the disgusting scumbag is also the only person in
the world that cares about him and vice versa.  From the obvious
affection, sometimes shown in his own way, we suspect Roger needs Igor
even more badly than his son's need for him, for Igor is the only human
connection he has and the only one he does not have to use and deceive.  
The relationship between this pair of father and son is peculiar as well
as familiar to us, which makes Igor's dilemma feel closer to the
audience. 
        Luc and Jean-Pierre Dardenne brought their years of experience in 
documentary filmmaking into this dramatic story.  The dialogues are cut
to a minimum as well as the display of emotions.  Every actor except
Jeremie Renier was given very little close shots to their faces.  Even the
extremely intense final confrontation is handled in a flat, almost
monotonous manner.  Soon I felt I was putting myself in the characters'
positions and empathize with them.  The motivations, conflicts, choices
and feelings are so real, almost as real as the dirty slum and the illegal
immigrants living in it.  
        Renier is required to carry this film on his slim shoulders.  With
the camera constantly staring at his face, he has to walk the fine line
between over-acting and being obscurity.  There is nothing in his
performance that struck me as unnatural; and we feel the pain with him as
he torn between his conscience and father, the dark secret he cannot tell
and Assita's trusting face.  As usual, it is harder to hold back than to
be over-the-top.  Oliver Gourmet is absolutely the most realistic rogue
who is uncompromisingly repulsive from his appearance to his actions, yet
never a simplistic villain.  A good villain makes the audience feel
threatened and intimidated, because he is real (I said "he" because a
realistic female villain has yet to come to my mind) and reminds us of the
ones we meet and know in real life.  Without the verbal showdown, Roger in
some way resembles Dwight Yokam's Doyle in "Sling Blade" because they feel
"real."  Even though his muttering and frozen expression are the other end
of the spectrum, I feel the same chill as I had watching Doyle.  Assita
Ouedrago, who already made 3 films in her country Bugina Faso, was not
given enough close attention from the directors to dig her role, but I
just love the conviction she displays when she slaughters a chicken and
reads her husband's whereabout from the chicken's gut.  Everyone else
looks like they are dragged right from the streets.  
        As Assita, holding her baby, and Igor wandering through the cold,
dark streets, it feels like a world sinking and falling.  In a time more 
sociatal decay  is blamed on juvenile delinquents and harsher punishments
are demanded on younger criminals, the film questions how children can
develop sense of morality, conscience, and value in a corrupt world like
this.  It's also one person's inner journey of struggling to do the right 
thing, however hard it is.  It is nail-biting drama as well as a slice of 
true life.  I give it a B+.  Well done. 

Title
Review for Midnight in the Garden of Good and Evil (1997)
The following review may contain spoilers.  Those who do not wish to be
spoiled should stop here, but anyone who is not a Kevin Spacey fan might
as well pass this film, and I'll explain why. 
It is unfair to call the entire movie boring and terrible.  Unfortunately,
it's likely the impression of the viewers as they walk out of the theater,
because the 2nd half of the film leaves very little favorable traces in
their memory.  I was quite fascinated and impressed by the first hour or
so of this movie, in which a New York reporter comes down to Savanah to
write a 500-word essay about the famous Christmas party given by local
celebrity Jim Williams (Kevin Spacey), an antique and art dealer who
specializes in reviving old houses of Savanah.  Through the eyes of the
reporter John Kelso (John Cusack), the audience are led into the bizzare
and interesting world of colorful characters, beautiful architecture,
voodoo practioner, and social small talks that you wouldn't expect to hear
anywhere else.  
I have not read the book, so I can only judge from what on the screen.
Although fregmented and seemingly unconnected, these elements are very
enjoyable as we watch Mr. Kelso stroll through the streets of Savanah and
Mr. Williams' Mansion filled with paintings, antiques, Faberge eggs, and
hundreds of other dazzling props all over the place.  My attention was
held tightly throughout the first part of the film with these scattered
pieces, until the murder takes place.  Mr. Williams shot his homosexual
lover Billy Henson (Jude Law) in his study on Christmas night.  He claims
self-defense, but the prosecutor put him on trial for first degree murder.
The big trial thing is supposed to be the center of the film, and the
second half of the film spend almost every minute on it, which basically
ruined the film.  
The second half of the film abandons the mixture of surprises, fascination
and fun of the first half, and focuses on 3 characters only -- Kelso,
Williams' lawyer Sonny Seiler (Jack Thompson) and a drag queen Lady
Chablis (played by him/herself).  At first funny and eccentric, Lady
Chablis quickly degenerates into a bunch of old drag jokes that lack
neither local flavor nor originality.  Seiler provides some really
overblown courtroom drama that is not nearly to the level of any episode
of "Law and Order".  Kelso is the least interesting character, which is
natural, since he's from the Big Apple, yet he is given a lot of time on
screen to go through the boring and predictable P.I. act trying to clear
Williams' name. 
I have a big problem with the screenplay (written by John Lee Hencock),
which handles this material so weakly and poorly.  The characters are
drawn only superficially while dumb and tiring "who-done-it" senario goes
on and on and on.  I found my mind drifting away and growing more and more
impatient everytime the camera returns to the courtroom.  The filmmakers
mistakenly believe that the audience care about the mystery of whether
Williams is guilty and whether the jury will convict or aquit him, both
totally beside the point.  I cannot care less about either, and am hungry
for more about the motivation, relationship and emotions of the
characters, especially that of Williams.  No real attempt was made to
describe his affair with Hanson, or with anyone else in town.  It is
particularly disappointing since Kevin Spacey gave such a mysterious and
intriguing performance as the art dealer. 
Kevin Spacey once again gains a commanding presence in every scene he is
in and makes me miss him in every scene he is not in.  He plays Jim
Williams with elegance, confidence, class, subtlety, and hidden
complexity.  Unspeakable charm oozes out of him and spills all over the
screen.  Looking exquisitely appealing with a thick mustache and grey
hair, he sustains a style that is similar to that of Jack Vicennce in "LA
Confidential" yet visibly different and distinct.  He contains so much
mystery in his character that I wish to know more -- is his relationship
with Hanson like that of William Somerset Maugham? why did he request
Kelso to cover his party? how did he make his fortune?  Most important,
how is his conscience after killing his lover?  Alas, he was given minimal
time and lines in the later hour and half of the film, which is a huge
mistake.  From a female point of view, I feel that the character's
homosexuality is not very convincing and a little contrived in Spacey's
performance, but I could be wrong. 
I have nothing against John Cusack, but he is not given too much to work
with here.  His character goes through a series of facial expression of
astonishment in the first half of the movie, and then a series of
expression of embarrassment with prolonged plot involving Lady Chablis'
affection for him.  He is simply not very interesting, and the filmmakers
make him even duller in an effort to emphasis the fact that John Kelso is
a straight man.  They even go as far as shooting a routine and sketchy
romance between Kelso and local blonde Mandy Nichols (Alison Eastwood)
that contributes nothing to the film.  Somehow I got the impression that
the filmmakers do not feel that a gay character like Jim William can carry
the film and the audience need a straight, plain character like Kelso to
root for, so Kelso becomes the center of the story.  But they truly
underestimated Spacey's charisma and capability. 
As Williams' line near the end of the film, "Truth is in the eyes of the
beholder."  I did not care for a moment to find out if he is indeed
guilty, or if the jury will let him go.  The character himself is far more
fascinating than any event happening outside of his mind and his slick
smiles (which tickles me every time he flashes them!).  The terrible
editing replaces the shots of beautiful Savanah scenery with dreadful
courtroom.  The voodoo lady Minerva (Irma P. Hall) never does provide any
words of depth or revelation no matter how fancy the acts are.
Allison Eastwood's character is incredibly blurry and dull that we
practically know nothing about her and her past by the end of the
film.  The happen ending feels ridiculously forced and dumb.  Jack N.
Green's cinematography is gorgeous, but like Kevin Spacey's performance,
it is not given nearly enough time.  Superficial, uninvolving, the movie
feels like a piece of good work that never happened.  I give the film a
C+.  However, Spacey makes the two and a half hour entirely worthy.  

Title
Review for Kavkazskij plennik (1996)
Spoiler Alert: The following review is full of spoilers.  Be aware and
stop while you can if you don't want to lose the suspense!!!
        It doesn't happen that often, but it happened today -- I walked
out of the cinema with shamelessly wet eyes and don't know how to explain
it.
         The film is the Russian production "Prisoner of the Mountains."
It's a story about 2 Russian soldiers captured in the civil war in Chechen
by some village people.  It is inspired by a Leo Tolstoy's short story
written 100 years ago.  Stunned by how perfectly it fits today's
situation, my friend who watch the film with me said afterward: "I thought
we were much civilized by now."  Well, we are.  Instead of horses, we have
tanks; intead of swords, we have machine guns and helicopters and bombs.
It is amazing how little we have evolved and such a theme about war and
human spirits in the war is so unexpectedly timeless. 
        In the beginning of the film, a group of Russian soldiers are
ambushed in the mountains by Muslin villagers.  Bruised but alive,
the only 2 survivors were taken hostage by a village elder Mehamed Murat,
who planns to trade them for his only son who is imprisoned by the
Russians in town.  Veteran actor Oleg Menshikov plays the older, more
cynical soldier Sasha;  while the director's son Sergei Bodrov Jr. plays a
naive young man newly drafted and inexperienced in the war.  Chained
together, the two men first do not get along, but soon develop a
friendship and bond in the desperate situation.  
        As time goes on, the 2 prisoners also grow fond of the village
people, among which are Murat's daughter, a cute teenage girl with some
very real headaches in life, and their mute guard Hassan, who has an
emotional story in his past.  Yet, as Sasha says to his young friend,
"It's war, Vanya, you have to (kill them)."  And he did, in an attempt to
escape.  It is chilling to see how the people who are basically good are
capable of killing in cold blood, from both sides.  
        Like an invisible hand, the powerful bureaucratic machine that
initiated the meaningless war has made a simple hostage trade into a
mission impossible.  Vanya's desperate mother comes down to the village
and fights with teeth and nails to save her son while Mehamed Murat trying
to save his own, who is a teacher, not a soldier, but just another
casualty of the war.  The showdown goes on and the situation gets more and
more impossible to resolve, until the writers of the film utterly
eliminate all the possible ways for Vanya to survive the fate of being
executed.  The ending is an incredible payoff that first took me aback,
but became more and more logical as I chew on it.  
        The acting and cinematography of this film are quite interesting.
They look very crude in the beginning and all the villagers look like
local people temporarily turned actors.  It is too real to be real for a
movie.  The cinematography is undoubtedly beautiful in the portrayal of
the magnificent mountains and harsh land where these villagers have lived
for hundreds of years.  But there is never an over-the-top shot that
shouts out "I'm Oscar material."  The filmmakers present the story, the
scenery and the Muslin villagers' lives and cuture with such realism,
patience and subtlety that they fooled me for at least half an hour.  The
only "visible" acting is Oleg Menshikov's Sasha as the flashy and witty
joker.  Everyone else is low-keyed and real as if walking out of a
documentary, yet incredibly interesting and intriguing.  The characters
are so real and presented to effortlessly that I never stop and think
about their authenticity until way after the movie.  No one in this film
is flat, yet no one is glamerous or conventional in any way.  Even the
weary commander is interesting with only several scenes.  And the actor
who plays Mehamed Murat (whose name is too long for me to remember) goes
through the entire film solemnly and almost expressionlessly.  It was not
until I stepped out of the cinema did I realize his great delivery of the
role.  Quite amazing.  Everything is done way too realistically that you
let the effort of the filmmakers and actors slip by unnoticed.  I have
never seen anything quite like this. 
        Above all, it's a story about issues beyond one war or the concept
of war.  It's a complicated study of human hearts and spirits, both the
great dignity and compassion AND the horror and stupidity we are capable
of.  It is a lesson, all too real, all too contemporary and all too
universal.  I think it can be done so perfectly only by Russian artists.
Anyone else who attempts to tell the same story would probably fall into
melodrama and unsincerity.  The theme and idea are presented so
effortlessly and so effectively that we cannot but sigh with appreciation.
        The theme is heavy, but delivered in a quiet and smooth way.  The
middle part of the film is actually quite humorous (a trait I thought
Russians didn't have).  The ending is captivating, surprising but logical.
It is sort of happy, but also sad, and above that, it's uplifting.  It
makes me feel better about us and mankind as a whole.  It presents hope
after all for the world that maybe, perhaps, we can still make it out of
this swamp of killing, war, hatred and ignorance and idiocy.  
        It is a great film, an unforgetable experience.  I give it an A+.
Go see it.

Title
Review for Lone Star (1996)
        Finally got around to see "Lone Star."  It's hard to find a word
to describe it since I'm still totally overwhelmed, awestruck.  I guess
the word is "BIG", like a huge object struck in my face.  It's a funny way
to describe a movie, but my still-pounding heart can prove my reaction to
it.  It's perhaps the most complicated film I've seen since I saw
"Chinatown" last year (on video of course).  
        The central character Sam Deeds (Christ Cooper), is the new
sheriff in a small Texas town.  Early on we are told that his deceased 
father, Buddy Deeds (Matthew McConnaghey), was a legend in this town
carrying the same badget 40 years ago.  Yet somehow Sam's resentment to
him and certain rumors about Buddy's old deeds make us wonder.  This
suspicion is backed by a skeleton discovered in the deserted area outside
the town that belongs to the town's sheriff before Buddy, the much feared
and hated Charley Wade (Kris Kristofferson), an old fashioned small-town
sheriff who's done every bad thing you've heard of in western movies, from
squeezing money from local business (legal or otherwise) to killing
whoever he feels like.  Haunted by his own emotional baggage, Sam digs
into the whole murder business, trying to tear down the idol worshiped by
the town, and the deeper he goes, the more skeletons come to see the
daylight.  
        In the mean time, we get to know a couple of other families in
town, including Sam's high school lover Pilar (Elizabeth Pena), a widowed
school teacher, and her mother, plus Otis Payne, an old black bar owner
who may have witnessed the murder 40 years ago, and Colonal Payne, Otis'
son who has his own problems with his father.  And that's just the main
players in this movie.  It is impossible to recap the plot in a couple of
paragraphs so I might as well give up trying.  It's simply dazzling to
create such intricate and interwound storyline within a seemingly "usual"
plot of a murder mystery.  What's more mind-boggling, however, is the deep
and complex emotional relationship between the characters, which is
presented clearly, delicately, smoothly and subtly.  There are a handful
of parallel storylines connected with each other by the long-passed
murder, linking both the past and the present.  
        And just when you think it can't get any more complicated, the
writer/director/producer John Sayles stuffs in more social commentary
about racism and racial division, corrupt politics, people's tendency to
make legends out of their needs, the Mexican heritage of Texas, etc. etc.
The amazing thing is that none of these topics feel forced and detatched
from the story, because the core is still about the characters and how the
past sins of their fathers affect them.  It's about one's past that cannot
be shaken off easily,  which in turn echoes the history and present of
America.  The mirroring of personal lives and the big society is one of
the heavy themes of this picture.  It is also the focus on the characters
that keeps our attention and makes the film successful.  
        With half a dozen major characters and 15-20 minor ones, it's
simply amazing that almost none of them feel unrealistic (almost, with the
exception of Frances MacDormand's character, Sam's divorced wife).  The
emotions are real and believable in a cliched setup.  It proves my
theory that there is more drama in reality if you know how to put them
together.  What's satisfying is that the writer presents the discussion,
but does not cheapen it by trying to find an easy way out like so many
other films tend to do.  So you can't make a disillusioned girl give up
drug and love life with one heart-to-heart talk.  That's life.  It's
amazing to see John Sayles resists an easy solution from big social
problem down to the smallest personal conflict.  
        The actors are a blast too. My favorite performance is Joe
Morton, playing a successful black colonal facing his troubled feeling to
his father again after years of bitterness.  He handles it with such
delicacy and depth that it may well be the best performance from last year
that I have seen.  Everyone else is all the way up there too.  The
romantic element between two tired adults who love each other is natural
and persuasive.  Both Cooper and Pena gave convincing performances.  Plus
most of the supporting cast. 
        With so many characters and conflicts, some of them are bound to be
weaker than others, but there are still plenty of pearls in this pile of
treature. The Mexican illegal immigrants issue could be handled better.  
Some dialogues are a little too politically oriented and simplistic, less
subtle than others, but most of the emotions and feelings are genuine and 
heart-felt.  John Sayles is a typical American (but not Hollywood)
filmmaker.  He goes for the big, big issues, big story, big emotional
rides.  It's miracle that the screenplay feels close to real life all the
way through. The style of "Lone Star" is more or less in the root of
traditional story-telling.  The ending, however, is not that satisfying.
I personally had problems with the big secret revealed in the end, which I
thought the film could have done without. (Not that it can't be done.  I
read a Sam Shepherd play years ago with same theme.  It's just a little
too much here for this movie.)  
        I had much expectation for "Lone Star," and it still surprised me.
It's not perfect, but anyone who can take care of so many things at the
same time is more unbelievable than perfection.  It doesn't feel terribly
"personal" to me, but the complexity of the whole production (from the
script to direction to the performances, from the certral characters to
the guy with only one line) surpasses anything I can think of presently.
How did they do that?  Grade: A. 

Title
Review for Mononoke Hime (1997)
Written and directed by Hayao Miyazaki
Re-released and dubbed by Miramax in 1999
More than half way through the movie, I was reminded of Tsui Hark's
classic Hong Kong movie "Once Upon a Time in China." What can a Kung fu
political movie possibly have in common with a full-length Japanese
animation, you might ask? Well, they both have a complicated and
melodramatic story, a large number of characters, exciting visuals,
somewhat ambiguous morals stands, and way too many conflicts.
The story of Princess Mononoke is actually the story of a young man
named Ashitaka, who is infected with a deadly curse on his arm after he
kills a boar-turned-demon that is terrorizing his home town. In search
for a cure of this curse that's slowly eating him away, he gets on his
elk and sets for the far and away land full of gods and spirits, demons
and monsters, all sharing and fighting over the biggest forest you have
seen on a screen.
The real Princess Mononoke (San, dubbed by Claire Danes), was not
seriously introduced after almost 1/3 into the movie. Before that, was a
mingled and busy introduction of a bunch of other characters, including
Jigo, a monk on a undetermined mission (dubbed by Billy Bob Thorton),
Lady Eboshi, the leader of an industrial town that destroys the forest
for iron and hire former brothel-girls to make firearms (dubbed by
Minnie Driver). The plot takes way too long to cut into the central
conflict with the forest spirit and the wild animals on one side and the
iron town and the hunters on the other. But the ambitious filmmakers are
not satisfied with just one conflict, so he throws in a group of vicious
samourai, a tribe of boars driven out of their own home land, a bunch of
skeptical apes, an army of hunters wearing animal skin. Non of these
groups are exactly allies or simply enemies. The audience, just like
Ashitaka, have a real hard time taking sides and root for any one of
them, because the movie takes a lot of time (too much, I think) to
convince us that Lady Eboshi, even though she wants to destroy the
forest and animals for her own gain, is also a good leader and
compassionate woman. The monk Jigo, even though he wants to cut off the
forest spirit's head and sell it as the fountain of youth to the
Empiror, is a rather humorous character. Although our environmentalist
urge pushes us toward the side of the wolf girl San, her wolf tribe, and
the forest, the wild animals are obviously not just the victims and
often show their hostility and sharp teeth to the hero.
The moral ambiguity makes the story interesting, but the noise from all
groups and so many side characters dilute the main conflict and make the
plot cluttered and confused. The most annoying is the ape tribe, who
showed up convenient to serve no other purpose but to slow down the
heroes and the story by throwing small objects at them and making mean
comments. I'd rather see Miyazaki completely abandon some of these
miscelleneous subplots and concentrate on the main story line.
Another consequence of the moral ambiguity is the feeble and naive plea
of Ashitaka -- Hatred is bad. Can't we all get along? The appeal of the
central character is significantly impaired. Ashitaka is perhaps the
most bland hero I've seen for a while. He is so boring, dull, and blah,
that I secretly cheered the ending that did not have the two lovers live
together happily ever after. In fact, there is almost no chemistry
between San and Ashitaka. With far less screen time, San still comes
through as more interesting than her boyfriend, benefiting little more
than a fierce presence. The most fascinating character, however, is the
powerful and mysterious Lady Eboshi, calm, intelligent, dominating,
seductive.
The biggest merit of this movie is its incredible visual imagination.
There is no substitute for the sheer rush of seeing the breath-taking
images of mythical spirits towering over the land, thousands of cute
little tree ghosts (looking very much like aliens in The X-files except
being white instead of green) raining down, trees dying and falling. I
repeatedly have chills running down my spine at every shot of the
ferocious battle between the Nature and humans. I have never seen any
image in animation so powerful that it blows my mind. The magic and
creativity and sheer power of the battle scenes make Disney's The Lion
King look like a joke.
I never thought animations can transmit the impression of natural
surrounding so well. Simply imitating reality is not enough. Here
Miyazaki and his team successfully replicate the FEEL of the Nature, and
the audience have the illusion of being actually engulfed in the
mythical forest.
Another interesting achievement is the fight scenes in this movie.
Albeit short and sporatic, the fights are exciting and well drawn. The
excessive gore and blood, however, seem a bit over done.
The English dialogue is competently done, from the script translation to
dubbing.
The conflicts between the advancing humans and wild animals actually
remind me of the conflict between white men and Native Americans, even
though that was probably not what Miyazaki had in mind. With a more
interesting hero and more concentrated writing, it could have been an
animation that is not only incredible-looking, but also
thought-provoking.

Title
Review for L.A. Confidential (1997)
Screenplay by Brian Helgeland & Curtis Hanson
Directed by Curtis Hanson
Produced by Arnon Milchan & Curits Hanson & Michael Nathason
Based on the novel by James Ellroy
Music by Jerry Goldsmith
Actors inclue Kevin Spacey, Russell Crowe, Guy Pearce, James Cromwell,
David Strathairn, Kim Basinger, Danny DeVito.  
*SPOILER ALERT!!!!!!*
The following review contains many spoilers to the movie, if you have not
seen this movie (what are you waiting for?) and do plan to see  it in the
future, please stop here.  
Early 1950s, Los Angeles, a setting that repeatedly draws writers' and
filmmakers' fascination since the days of film noir.  The story of "L.A.
Confidential" is centered around three police officers, however, is not
really a noir, contrary to the claim of many critics.  It is not about a
simple twist of fate turning an ordinary man into a criminal, or a femme
fatale plotting an evil scheme.  It's a crime drama with a lot of brain
and blood, filled with suspense and surprise -- the result, a wonderfully
crafted piece of work.  
Lieutenant Edmund Jennings Exley (played by Guy Pearce) joined the police
force to follow his father, a highly decorated policeman killed in the
line of duty.  He quickly gains everyone's despise for snitching on his
fellow officers about "The Bloody Christmas" incidence -- a bunch of
drunken policemen beating up Mexican prisoners.  Among his haters is
Detective Wendell "Bud" White (played by Russell Crowe), a well-known
strongarmed man who is feared by all wife-beaters in the city.  The third
protagonist is Sergant Jack Vincennes (played by the always lovable Kevin
Spacey), a celebrity cop on the narcotic division who likes to bust
drug-sniffing actors and actresses and works as a "technical advisor" on
the police TV show "Badge of Honor."  He loves the spotlight and being on
the cover of "Hush-Hush" magazine, a gossip tabloid run by Sid Hudgens
(played by Danny DeVito).  
The central mistery is "The Nite Owl Massecre" in which 6 people are
slaughtered, including Bud White's partner Dick Stansland and a girl who
look like Rita Haworth.  Exley, White and Spacey start on different
tracks, all become somhow involved into this case and form an unlikely
alliance to solve it.  In the process, we have a handful of puzzling and
messy clues including 3 black young man and a gang rape, some pornographic
pcitures, call girls who are cut like movie stars and entertain the rich
and powerful of "the city of fallen angles" and a suave businessman who
run this ring of prostitution, Pierce Patchett (played by David
Strathairn), plus a romance between Bud White and a prostitute Lynn
Bracken who looks like Veronica Lake.  In the middle of all this is the
riddling Captain Dudley Smith (played by James Cromwell) who favors
violence as the basic means of solving crimes and is constantly trying to
recruit White into his "extracurricular activities" often set in Victory
Motel.  
The spirit of this film is deeply cynical, with conspiracy upon
conspiracy, and corruption of city officials closely knit with organized
criminals and Hollywood showbiz and tabloid journalism.  Police brutality
is encouraged in LAPD and coverups are routine.  It is the same city of
sins as that in Darshiell Hammet and Raymond Chandler's novels --
glamorous, filthy, decadent, corrupt and fascinating, with plenty of
shadowed spots hiding the evil. 
The original James Ellroy's novel of the same title is an incredibly
complex mass of murders, conspiracies, crimes and the darkest secrets of
human minds.  It is virtually impossible to adapt it straight from the
book, so writer Helgeland and Hanson come up with their own story line
that is equally complex and make perfect sense, but more effective and
comprehensible in a 2-hour movie, while saving all the goodies from the
book -- blocks of intense scenes, tasty dialogues, brutal actions and,
most of all, complicated, shady characters.  They also create several
twists of their own that rival the novel, eg. the amusing Lana Turner
scene and the good-cop-badd-cop interrogation of D.A. Ellis Lowe, and the
extremely original treatment of the death of Jack Vincennes that is
more clever than the book. 
Although the plot of "L.A. Confidential" is satisfyingly complex as any
good mystery/crime thriller with plenty of twists and surprises, the best
thing about it is no doubt the characters and the acting performances.  It
is mind-boggling how they picked the two young Australian actors -- Crowe
and Pearce to play the leads and fit in with such perfection.  Sporting a
squeaky-clean American accent, they are exactly how White and Exley should
look and act like and feel like.  In the mean time, the writers should be
credited for being so fearless to maintain the serious flaws in the
characters, flaws that are not decorative and easily forgivable as they
often are in the usual heroes in most police/crime dramas.  The flaws do
not function to juice up the characters, but to present truly ambiguous
and fascinating ones. 
Russell Crowe's Bud White seems to be just another tough cop who does not
hesitate to use a bit force to rough up criminals and bad guys.  His
violent tendency is hard for us to overlook and deeply troubling.
Gradually we learn of the origin of this problem and his hatred for men
who abuse women.  He is a man carrying an emnormous emotional baggage that
he's lucky for maintaining his sanity (although sometimes he doesn't look
that sane really).  Crowe's rugged good look and uninhibited tenderness at
times make White irresistable, especially to female viewers, despite the
dark side of him.  It is a passionate performance that's radient with
intense physical and emotional appeal.  
Ed Exley appears to be the straight arrow in the beginning, but the first
30 minutes of the film quickly reveals to us that he is not the
by-the-book college boy type we anticipate as a contrast to the explosive
Bud White.  He is intelligent, calculating and ruthless, ready to squash
anyone that gets in the way of his advancement.  With the cold eyes behind
the rimless spectacles and the occasional sly half-smile, Guy Pearce hits
the role with the precision that Exley would be proud of.  It is difficult
to like Exley as a character, which makes his transformation even more
interesting.  What drives his transformation is the undying conscience
that urges him to put aside his ambition and pursue the true justice.  
Conscience is also the key factor to change Jack Vincennes, who is corrupt
and sleazy at first.  This is the character most detached from the novel,
given a different personality and aura, perfected by the marvelous Kevin
Spacey.  He presents this celebrity cop with his cat-like grace,
irresistable smile and sheer confidence, and a couple of priceless moments
in which he shows internal conflict by nothing but the look on his face.
It is impossile for me not to adore him as an actor.  
Two scenes have been considered out of characters -- Exley jumping Lynn
Bracken and White beating her for sleeping with Exley.  However, it made
perfect sense to me from the first viewing and seems evern more logical
the second time.  It is not immediately obvious but definately within
charaters.  Exley and White form an nice symmetrical image.  They are not
the exact opposite as "Lethal Weapon", but the balanced harmoneous
contrast that remind me of the symmetry in Chinese poetry.  Exley is not
the straight arrow when he kills 3 suspects, and White is not the
brainless thug when he does his own investigation on Nite Owl case and
manages to always stay one step ahead of Exley who considers himself
vastly superior and smarter than White.
The characters are the stongest elements of the film, and also the
weakness.  It would work better if the writer sacrefice a little time of
the plot and invest it into digging the characters.  We know Bud White's
motivation, but what is Exley and Vincennes's personal baggage?  I wish
the filmmakers explore it a little more than a quick explanation like
"Rolo Temasi".  As interesting and complicated as the plot is, it still
goes the conventional way to tell a crime-solving story and is not
terribly profound or deep other than the characters.  
The supporting cast are well above average, James Cromwell as Cptn. Dudley
Smith, Kim Basinger as the weathered prostitute, Danny DeVito as the
sleazy Sid Hudgens.  All adaquate and wonderful.  But the winners are the
three leading men, nailing their roles perfectly.  There could be no
better interpretation of Ellroy's shady and unlikely heroes. 
The cinematography, art design and style are quite authentic, I suppose,
to the period of 1950s, but pale in comparison to Carl Franklin's smooth
"Devil in a Blue Dress".  Director Curtis Hanson delivers numerous tightly
paced and well executed scenes: eg. the 3-way interrogation  of the Nite
Owl suspects, White beating the woman he loves, naturalistic and
emotionless violence scenes.  And the final shootout at Victory Motel.
The grim anticipation of the two partners out-numbered by the villains,
the way they pump slugs into attackers' bellies, the bad guy surrending to
the approaching police and Exley shooting him in the back, all feel so
strongly like the finale of John Woo's "The Killer" minus the passion and
slo-mo.  
The first time I saw this film, the ending seems like a cop-out, pulling a
"Lethal Weapon 2" on the audience, as many other feel the same way.  It
may look better in the book, but not so convincing on screen.  The second
time really feels much better, much sadder, and more more grim as the look
on Exley's face as he look on with the lone burden on his conscience.  
I am a sucker for this genre movies as well as novels, but an even bigger
sucker for well-written and well-performed characters.  "L.A.
Confidential" satisfies both aspects of my appetite.  It is still the
unmatched best of 1997, a weak year in good movies.  I give it A-, the
only A in 97 films. 

Title
Review for Children of the Revolution (1996)
        It's Australia, 1953.  A young, attractive college student Joan
(played by Judy Davis) is a passionate communist firmly believes in the
Soviet Union and the world-famous figure Joseph Stalin.  Although without
much support in her own world, she stands by her faith and writes letters
to Stalin with all her admiration.  They somehow get to catch Stalin's
eyes (Stalin played by Murray Abraham, who in no way reminds me of Stalin
at all in his appearance despite his chunky nose).  The next thing we
know, she's on her way to Moscow and has a one-night-stand with him which
both kills him with a heart attack and inpregnated her.  Back to
Australia, Joan marries her puppy lover Zackery Welch (played with ease by
Geoffery Rush) and makes him swear never tell anyone he's not really her
boy's father. 
        The boy, Joseph Welch, grows up with a strange interest in going
to jail, and he does finally, for refusing to register in the army to go
to Vietnam.  Although brain-washed by his mother all his life about the
greatness of Communism and Stalin, he does later recognizes the ugly truth
of his father.  He seems to be a sweet natured kid at first. However, as
time passes by, he slowly develops an appetite for power and dominance and
becomes alarming like one certain famous historical figure.  
        As a political satire, the film definitely shows its weakness in
dealing with the reality of the Soviet Union and Stalin.  All the scenes
in Moscow with Stalin and his guards/followers fall into the level of
forced comedy that's not very funny.  But the parts with Joan and people
surrounding her and her passion for Stalin as well as Communism are quite
amuzing -- at least to me, who grew up in a Communist country yet am never
convinced and converted of the idea.  She is more of a comical and pitiful
figure than a force that persuades anyone.  
        Other characters in the film are less one-dimensional and more
interesting.  The passive, good-hearted husband Welch, the secretive (at
least trying hard  to be secretive) KGB/Secret Service Man and double
agent David (played with understated humor by Sam Neil) who has a crush on
Joan and fantacizes being Joe's father, and  Joe's police officer wife,
Anna, who gets into dating him by repeated arresting him in anti-Vietnam
war protests.  This is probably the funniest and most genuine part of the
film and gains much chuckles from the audience.  They are not simplified
personalities that we've seen in other films and they keep me interested.  
        The plot itself is not that intersting and engaging.  The writer
does not seem to have made up his mind as to what would be the theme or
central issue of the film.  Ideas are not developed and story lines
scatter all over the place without a clear destination.  A clear example
is the transformation of Joe Welch as his hunger for power and control
grows.  He is a sweet kid when he grows up and dates Anna.  He clearly
recognizes Stalin's brutality and cruelty.  He even saves a prison
officer's life risking his own.  Even as he slips down the slope into the
like of his father, he still tells his mother that all her faith is
meaningless and useless.  However, the filmmaker never makes clear just
what his ultimate intentions are.  He said it's a "revolution." But his
own cynicism and disbelief in Communism hardly support that claim.  And
the finale is strange and illogical.  
